Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 10 FOUNDATION PROGRAM — STATE AID — APPORTIONMENT
33-1006. Transportation support program.

The state board of education shall determine what costs of transporting pupils, including maintenance, operation and depreciation of basic vehicles, insurance, payments under contract with other public transportation providers whose vehicles used to transport pupils comply with federal transit administration regulations, “bus testing,” 49 CFR part 665, and any revision thereto, as provided in subsection (4)(d) of this section, or other state department of education-approved private transportation providers, salaries of drivers, and any other costs, shall be allowable in computing the transportation support program of school districts.

Any costs associated with the addition of vehicle features that are not part of the basic vehicle shall not be allowable in computing the transportation support program of school districts. A basic vehicle is hereby defined as the cost of the vehicle without optional features, plus the addition of essential safety features and features necessary for the transportation of pupils with disabilities.

Each school district shall maintain records and make reports as are required for the purposes of this section.

The transportation support program of a school district shall be based upon the allowable costs of:

Transporting public school pupils one and one-half (1 ½) miles or more to school;

Transporting pupils less than one and one-half (1 ½) miles as provided in section 33-1501, Idaho Code, when approved by the state board of education;

Payments when transportation is not furnished, as provided in section 33-1503, Idaho Code;

The transportation program for grades 6-12, upon the costs of payments pursuant to a contract with other public or private transportation providers entered into as provided in section 33-1510, Idaho Code, if the school district establishes that the reimbursable costs of transportation under the contract are equal to or less than the costs for school buses;

The employer’s share of contributions to the public employee retirement system and to social security; and

Providing transportation to and from approved school activities as may be approved by the rules of the state board of education.

The state’s share of the transportation support program shall be fifty percent (50%) of reimbursable transportation costs of the district incurred during the immediately preceding state fiscal year, except for the cost of state department of education training and fee assessments and bus depreciation and maintenance, for which the state’s share shall be eighty-five percent (85%) of such costs. For school districts that contract for pupil transportation services, the state’s share shall be the average state share of costs for district-run operations, based on the statewide total of such costs. Provided however, that the reimbursable costs for any school district shall not exceed one hundred three percent (103%) of the statewide average reimbursable cost per mile or the state average reimbursable cost per student rider, whichever is more advantageous to the school district. If a school district’s costs exceed the one hundred three percent (103%) limit when computed by the more advantageous of the two (2) methods, that school district shall be reimbursed at the appropriate percentage designated by this subsection, multiplied by the maximum limit for whichever method is more favorable to the school district. A school district may appeal the application of the one hundred three percent (103%) limit on reimbursable costs to the state board of education, which may establish for that district a new percentile limit for reimbursable costs compared to the statewide average, which is higher than one hundred three percent (103%). In doing so, the state board of education may set a new limit that is greater than one hundred three percent (103%), but is less than the percentile limit requested by the school district. However, the percentage increase in the one hundred three percent (103%) cap shall not exceed the percentage of the district’s bus runs that qualify as a hardship bus run, pursuant to this subsection. Any costs above the new level established by the state board of education shall not be reimbursed. Such a change shall only be granted by the state board of education for hardship bus runs. To qualify as a hardship bus run, such bus run shall meet at least two (2) of the following criteria:
(a) The number of student riders per mile is less than fifty percent (50%) of the statewide average number of student riders per mile;

Beginning on July 1, 2005, any eligible home-based public virtual school may claim transportation reimbursement for the prior fiscal year’s cost of providing educational services to students. In order to be eligible, such a school shall have at least one (1) average daily attendance divisor, pursuant to section 33-1002, Idaho Code, that is greater than the median divisor shown for any category of pupils, among the actual divisors listed. For the purposes of paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection (6), “education provider” means the home-based public virtual school or an entity that has legally contracted with the home-based public virtual school to supply education services. Reimbursable costs shall be limited to the costs of:

Providing an internet connection service between the student and the education provider, not including the cost of telephone service;

Providing electronic and computer equipment used by the student to transmit educational material between the student and the education provider;

Providing a toll-free telephone service for students to communicate with the education provider;

Providing education-related, face-to-face visits by representatives of the home-based public virtual school, with such reimbursements limited to the mileage costs set for state employee travel by the state board of examiners; and

Any actual pupil transportation costs that would be reimbursable if claimed by a school district.

The state department of education shall calculate the amount of state funds lost in fiscal year 2010 by each school district as a result of the decrease in the state reimbursement from eighty-five percent (85%) to fifty percent (50%) of certain eligible costs, including the reduction calculated for districts that contract for pupil transportation services, and excluding any reductions made due to the limitation on reimbursable expenses, all pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. The amount so calculated shall be distributed to each school district in fiscal year 2010. For each fiscal year thereafter, the amount distributed pursuant to this subsection (7) for each school district shall be determined as follows:

Divide the amount distributed to the district pursuant to this subsection (7) in fiscal year 2010 by the district’s support units for fiscal year 2010;

Multiply the result of the calculation found in subsection (7)(a) of this section by the number of support units in the current fiscal year;

Determine the percentage change in statewide transportation reimbursements as provided for in subsection (5) of this section since fiscal year 2010;

Determine the percentage change in statewide student enrollment since fiscal year 2010;

Subtract the result of the calculation found in subsection (7)(d) of this section from the result of the calculation found in subsection (7)(c) of this section;

Adjust the result of the calculation found in subsection (7)(b) of this section by the percentage result from subsection (7)(e) of this section.

The total moneys paid to school districts and public charter schools for eligible transportation costs shall be reduced by a proportionate amount to equal seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000) and shall be used as discretionary spending.

(b) Less than a majority of the miles on the bus run are by paved surface, concrete or asphalt road;

(c) Over ten percent (10%) of the miles driven on the bus run are a five percent (5%) slope or greater.

The total reimbursement for such home-based public virtual schools shall be exempt from the statewide average cost per mile limitations of this section. The state’s share of reimbursable costs shall be eighty-five percent (85%), subject to the statewide cost per student rider provisions of this section. For the purposes of such home-based public virtual school, the number of student riders shall be the same as the number of pupils in average daily attendance.

For school districts divided after fiscal year 2010, the calculation in subsection (7)(a) of this section shall still be based on the fiscal year 2010 figures for the formerly consolidated district. For public charter schools beginning operations on or after July 1, 2009, all calculations in this subsection (7) that are based on fiscal year 2010 shall instead be based on the public charter school’s first fiscal year of operations. For the purposes of this subsection (7), the support units used shall be the number used for calculating salary-based apportionment. Funds distributed pursuant to this subsection (7) shall be used to defray the cost of pupil transportation. If the amount distributed is in excess of a school district’s actual pupil transportation costs, less any state reimbursements provided by subsection (5) of this section, the excess funds may be used at the school district’s discretion.

33-1006A. Pupil transportation audits. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

33-1007. Exceptional education program report.

The state department of education shall report annually to the legislature the status of the exceptional education support program. The report shall include, but not be limited to, data concerning the number of students with disabilities and gifted students served, the districts which operate programs and the nature of the program, the money distributed pursuant to the provisions of the exceptional education support program, and estimated number of students with disabilities and gifted students, requiring but not receiving services. The report shall be filed not later than the fifteenth day of the legislative session and may include recommendations of the board relating to administrations of the program.

33-1007A. Feasibility study and plan for school closures and/or school district consolidation.

The state superintendent of public instruction shall determine the reimbursable costs to any school district which are incurred under the provisions of section 33-310B, Idaho Code. The school district shall be entitled to reimbursement of all allowable costs pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the state board of education.

In school districts where the implementation of a school closure plan requires the consolidation of one or more schools, the support program allowance for the consolidated school for a seven (7) year period following school consolidation, shall not be less than the combined support program allowance of the component schools in the last year of operation.

33-1008. Support program — Elementary district reclassified.

Should any elementary school district which has met the qualifications required by law for reclassification as a secondary school district propose to be so reclassified and begin the establishment and maintenance of a secondary school, that district shall be allowed a support program for the secondary school during the first year of its operation, computed as follows:

The educational support program shall be reported in the annual report preceding the beginning of operation of the secondary school, as the aggregate of the products of the number of resident pupils of the district who attended secondary schools of other districts during the preceding year, multiplied by the per-pupil state and county apportionments for the educational support program to the other districts as shown on the last approved tuition certificate of the other districts, for secondary school pupils.

The transportation support program shall be reported in the annual report preceding the beginning of operation of the secondary school, as the aggregate of the products of the number of pupils proposed to be transported to the new secondary school who attended secondary schools in other districts during the preceding year, multiplied by the per-pupil state and county apportionments for the transportation support program to each of the other districts for secondary school pupils as shown on the last approved tuition certificate issued to the other district.

33-1008A. Apportionments for increased average daily attendance. [Repealed.]

33-1009. Payments from the public school income fund.

a. Payments of the state general account appropriation for public school support shall be made each year by the state department of education to the public school districts of the state in four (4) payments. Payments to the districts shall be made not later than the fifteenth day of August, the fifteenth day of November, the fifteenth day of February, and the fifteenth day of May each year. The first payment by the state department of education shall be approximately fifty percent (50%) of the total general account appropriation for the fiscal year, while the second and third payments shall be approximately twenty percent (20%) each, and the fourth payment approximately ten percent (10%) respectively, except as provided for in section 33-5209C, Idaho Code. Amounts apportioned due to a special transfer to the public school income fund to restore or reduce a deficiency in the prior year’s transfer pursuant to subsection 4. of this section shall not be subject to this limitation.

Payments made to the school districts in August and November are advance payments for the current year and may be based upon payments from the public school income fund for the preceding school year. Each school district may receive its proportionate share of the advance payments in the same ratio that its total payment for the preceding year was to the total payments to all school districts for the preceding year.

No later than the fifteenth day of February in each year, the state department of education shall compute the state distribution factor based on the total average daily attendance through the first Friday in November. The factor will be used in payments of state funds in February and May. Attendance shall be reported in a format and at a time specified by the state department of education.

b. Payments of moneys, other than the state general account appropriation, that accrue to the public school income fund shall be made by the state department of education to the school districts of the state on the fifteenth day of November, February, May and July each year. The total amount of such payments shall be determined by the state department of education and shall not exceed the amount of moneys available and on deposit in the public school income fund at the time such payment is made.

c. Amounts apportioned due to a special transfer to the public school income fund to restore or reduce a deficiency in the prior year’s transfer pursuant to subsection 4. of this section shall not be subject to the limitation imposed by paragraphs a. and b. of this subsection.

As of the thirtieth day of June of each year the state department of education shall determine final payments to be made on July fifteenth next succeeding to the several school districts from the public school income fund for the school year ended June 30. The July payments shall take into consideration:

a. The average daily attendance of the several school districts for the twenty-eight (28) best weeks of the school year completed not later than the thirtieth of June;

b. All funds available in the public school income fund for the fiscal year ending on the thirtieth of June;

c. All payments distributed for the current fiscal year to the several school districts;

d. The adjustment based on the actual amount of discretionary funds per support unit required by the provisions of section 33-1018, Idaho Code;

e. Payments made or due for the transportation support program and the exceptional education support program. The state department of education shall apportion and direct the payment to the several school districts the moneys in the public school income fund in each year, taking into account the advance made under subsection 2. of this section, in such amounts as will provide in full for each district its support program, and not more than therefor required, and no school district shall receive less than fifty dollars ($50.00).
4. If the full amount appropriated to the public school income fund from the general account by the legislature is not transferred to the public school income fund by the end of the fiscal year, the deficiency resulting therefrom shall either be restored or reduced through a special transfer from the general account in the first sixty (60) days of the following fiscal year, or shall be calculated in computing district levies, and any additional levy shall be certified by the state superintendent of public instruction to the board of county commissioners and added to the district’s maintenance and operation levy. If the deficiency is restored or reduced by special transfer, the amount so transferred shall be in addition to the amount appropriated to be transferred in such following fiscal year and shall be apportioned to each school district in the same amount as each would have received had the transfer been made in the year the deficiency occurred. The state department of education shall distribute to the school district the full amount of the special transfer as soon as practical after such transfer is made. In making the levy computations required by this subsection the state department of education shall take into account and consider the full amount of money receipted into the public school income fund from all sources for the given fiscal year. Deficits in the transfer of the appropriated amount of general account revenue to the public school income fund shall be reduced by the amount, if any, that the total amount receipted from other sources into the public school income fund exceeds the official estimated amount from those sources. The official estimate of receipts from other sources shall be the total amount stated by the legislature in the appropriation bill. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any transfers to or from the public education stabilization fund.

5. Any apportionments in any year, made to any school district, which may within the succeeding three (3) year period be found to have been in error either of computation or transmittal, may be corrected during the three (3) year period by reduction of apportionments to any school district to which over-apportionments may have been made or received, and corresponding additions to apportionments to any school district to which under-apportionments may have been made or received.

33-1009A. Decrease in weighted average daily attendance. [Repealed.]

33-1010. Apportionments when mines net profits considered.

In any school district in which mines net profits are made a part of the total assessed value of taxable property, should the amount of such net profits certified as required by section 63-2803, Idaho Code, be lower in any year than for the immediately preceding year in an amount equaling five per cent (5%) or more of the total assessed value of taxable property of the district for the preceding year, then the state department of education shall compute the adjusted value of taxable property in the district for the purposes of section 33-1009, Idaho Code, by subtracting from the adjusted value of property in the district for the preceding year, the total of such decrease in mines net profits tax.

The county auditor of each county in which the net profits of mines are made a part of the total assessed value of taxable property of any school district, shall annually examine the reports of mines net profits certified to the county assessor as required by section 63-2803, Idaho Code, and shall certify to the state department of education not later than the fifteenth day of June of each year, the net profits of mines creditable to each school district in said county.

33-1011. Taxes to be levied by county commissioners — Determination and certification.

Not later than the second Monday in September of each year the state superintendent of public instruction shall determine and certify to the board of county commissioners the amounts of money as shall be required under the provisions of this chapter.

33-1012. Transmittal of county school moneys.

Not later than the 10th day of each month, beginning August 1, 1981, the county auditor shall compute the moneys in the county school fund and shall transmit not later than that date the amount determined to the treasurer of the state of Idaho for deposit to the public school income fund, and these moneys shall be apportioned to the public schools in the same manner as prescribed by law for other moneys credited to the public school income fund.

33-1013. County treasurer — County auditor — Duties.

In addition to other duties required by this chapter, the county treasurer shall keep a separate account with each school district situate in whole or in part in his county, placing to the credit of each all moneys received through the proceeds of school district tax levies, and any other moneys due the respective districts under the provisions of law. He shall on the first day of each month give notice to the clerk of the board of any elementary district, of the debits and credits made to the account of such district during the current quarter and the balance on hand both at the beginning and at the end of the preceding quarter.

He shall keep an account of the county school fund, and of any other school funds arising from a county-wide tax levy for school purposes.

He shall pay over the moneys in any fund herein required to be kept, only upon the warrant of the county auditor.

In addition to other duties required of the county auditor by the provisions of this chapter, he shall, from time to time as required by law, draw his warrant upon any fund required to be disbursed to the treasurer of any school district.

33-1014. Assessment ratios and equivalency determinations. [Repealed.]

33-1015. State revenue matching under the national school lunch act.

In school districts where personnel are employed to operate a school lunch program partially funded under provisions of the national school lunch act, all employer paid contributions to the social security administration for school lunch personnel shall be paid from funds received by school districts from the state general account appropriation for public school support.

33-1016. Levies. [Repealed.]

33-1017. School safety and health revolving loan and grant fund.

Fund created. There is hereby created a fund in the state treasury to be known as the school safety and health revolving loan and grant fund to which shall be credited all moneys that may be appropriated, apportioned, allocated and paid back to that fund. Moneys in this fund shall be used exclusively as provided in this section, except that moneys in this fund shall be returned to the budget stabilization fund as provided in this section.

Approval of loan or grant. A school district that does not have the financial resources to abate unsafe or unhealthy conditions identified pursuant to section 33-1613, Idaho Code, and which is eligible to seek additional funds under subsection (5)(b)(ii) of section 33-1613, Idaho Code, may apply to the state treasurer for a loan and, if eligible, a grant from the [school] safety and health revolving loan and grant fund. A school district that has borrowed money from the Idaho safe school facilities loan program may apply for a grant of interest from the [school] safety and health revolving loan and grant fund. The loan or grant shall be approved if the school district’s application meets the criteria of section 33-1613, Idaho Code, and of this section. If the board of examiners finds that existing and anticipated loans or grants under this section have depleted the school safety and health revolving loan and grant fund to an extent that the fund does not have available sufficient moneys to loan to an eligible school district, the board of examiners shall declare that additional loans may be made from the budget stabilization fund in section 57-814, Idaho Code, up to any limits of the use of that fund provided by statute or declared by the governor in time of general revenue shortfalls or major disaster.

Conditions of loan or grant — Repayment of loan.

The school district’s application shall identify the unsafe or unhealthy conditions that would be abated with the proceeds of the loan or grant and, if a loan, shall propose a method of and timetable for abating those conditions and for repaying the loan.

The state treasurer shall review the application to determine whether the application is for abatement of unsafe or unhealthy conditions as described in section 33-1613, Idaho Code, and to determine whether the estimated costs of abatement and proposed plan of abatement is reasonable. In reviewing the application, the state treasurer may call upon the assistance of the state division of building safety, the state fire marshal, the state department of administration, the state board of education, the state department of education, or other knowledgeable persons to determine whether conditions identified to be abated meet the criteria of section 33-1613, Idaho Code, and to determine whether the plan of abatement, estimated costs of abatement and proposed methods of abatement are reasonable. The state treasurer shall process the application for a loan or grant within thirty-five (35) days after its receipt.

If the state treasurer determines that the application has not identified unsafe or unhealthy conditions as described in section 33-1613, Idaho Code, the state treasurer shall return the application with a written statement that contains reasons why the loan or grant application does not meet the criteria of this section and of section 33-1613, Idaho Code.

If the state treasurer determines that the application has identified unsafe or unhealthy conditions as described in section 33-1613, Idaho Code, the state treasurer shall then determine whether the application has proposed reasonable methods of and reasonable estimates of costs of abatement. The state treasurer shall approve the plan of abatement if the school district has proposed a reasonable method of abatement and if its estimated costs of abatement are reasonable; otherwise, the state treasurer shall return the application with a written statement how the application can be amended to qualify.
(c) If the application is for a loan, the state treasurer may accept the school district’s proposed method of and timetable for repaying the loan or may impose reasonable alternative or substitute methods of and timetables for repayment consistent with this subsection, which alternative or substitute methods shall be binding on the school district. At a minimum, the school district shall be required to repay in each fiscal year succeeding the year of the loan an amount no less than the lottery proceeds that the school district would otherwise receive for that fiscal year and additional foundation support moneys, if any, accruing as a result of an initial overestimation of state average daily attendance support units and later distribution of residual amounts resulting from fewer support units than originally estimated. The loan shall provide for the school safety and health revolving loan and grant fund, or the budget stabilization fund, to the extent that it was the source of the loan, to intercept the lottery proceeds that would otherwise go to the school district until the loan is fully repaid. In addition, the state treasurer may impose reasonable fiscal conditions on the school district during the term of loan repayment including, but not limited to, restrictions in use of otherwise unrestricted school district moneys to assist in repayment of the loan or in abatement of unsafe or unhealthy conditions, the declaration of a financial emergency during some or all of the term of repayment of the loan, or interception by the school safety and health revolving loan and grant fund of a portion of the state foundation program payments under chapter 10, title 33, Idaho Code, that would otherwise go to the school district to repay the loan. The initial term of the loan shall not exceed ten (10) years, but may be extended in the state treasurer’s discretion for another ten (10) years.

Interest. Loans to school districts under this section shall bear interest at the average rate of interest that would be available to the state treasury were the loan funds retained in the state treasury, as determined by the state treasurer.

Certification of loan funds spent. If a school district obtains a loan pursuant to this section, the board of trustees shall certify the total expenditures of loaned funds that were actually spent to abate unsafe and unhealthy conditions.

Excess funds. If any funds loaned pursuant to this section were not spent on abatement of unsafe and unhealthy conditions, they must be returned to the school safety and health [revolving] loan and grant fund or the budget stabilization fund, as the case may be. This subsection shall be judicially enforceable by the state treasurer, and any amounts due for repayment under this subsection may be recovered by offset from state foundation program moneys that would otherwise be paid to the school district.

Eligibility for grant. After complying with the provisions of section 33-1613, Idaho Code, school districts that borrow money from the Idaho safe schools facilities loan program pursuant to section 33-804A, Idaho Code, or that refinance through the Idaho safe schools facilities loan program loans for money borrowed under this section or that finance abatement of unsafe and unhealthy conditions through indebtedness pursuant to chapter 11, title 33, Idaho Code, may apply for a grant from the school safety and health revolving loan and grant fund to pay for eligible interest costs incurred on loan proceeds used to abate unsafe and unhealthy conditions. If the school district’s application for a grant is accepted, then the school district will qualify for a grant of the present value of the qualifying percentage of the interest costs of the loan associated with abating unsafe and unhealthy conditions as follows:

If the school district is participating in the Idaho safe schools facilities loan program, within seven (7) days after the approved school district receives loan proceeds from the Idaho safe schools facilities loan fund, the state treasurer shall provide funds to the school district in the amount of the qualifying percentage of the present value of the interest costs associated with abating unsafe and unhealthy conditions.

If a school district has obtained a loan from the school health and safety revolving loan and grant fund and has refinanced its loan through the Idaho safe schools facilities program and prepays the outstanding principal of its loan, the school district shall be eligible for a grant of the qualifying percentage of the present value of the outstanding interest costs associated with the prepaid principal.

If the school district has financed the abatement of unsafe or unhealthy conditions through indebtedness pursuant to chapter 11, title 33, Idaho Code, within seven (7) days after the school district receives bond proceeds, the state treasurer shall provide funds to the school district in the amount of the qualifying percentage of the present value of the interest costs associated with abating unsafe and unhealthy conditions.

Present value. The present value of the interest costs associated with money borrowed under the Idaho safe schools facilities loan program shall be calculated by the state treasurer using a method of equal annual loan payments and a discount rate of the interest rate prescribed in subsection (4) of this section on the date that the school district receives funds from the Idaho safe schools facilities loan fund. The present value of the unpaid interest costs for principal prepayments to the school safety and health revolving loan and grant fund shall be calculated by the state treasurer by summing the unpaid interest that would be paid without the principal prepayment and discounting it at the interest rate prescribed in subsection (4) of this section on the date that the treasurer receives the prepayment. The present value of the interest costs associated with money borrowed by a school district in a bond issue shall be calculated by the state treasurer using the school district’s actual schedule for making interest payments on the bonds and discounting those interest payments by the interest rate prescribed in subsection (4) of this section on the date that the school district receives funds from the bond issue.

Qualifying percentage. The qualifying percentage of the interest costs of a school district applying for a grant of interest under this section shall be determined as follows: For a school district borrowing money under the Idaho safe schools facilities loan program or refinancing a loan made under this section with money borrowed under the Idaho safe schools facilities program or incurring bonded indebtedness for safe and healthy schools, the state treasurer shall express:

the total of the bond and plant facilities levies imposed by the school district (including the levy for which the application is made), and

the total levies imposed by the school district (including the levy for which the application is made)

(d) If a loan is approved, the state treasurer shall establish a line of credit for the school district and monthly reimburse the school district for costs incurred to abate the unsafe or unhealthy conditions identified as the reason for the loan. The state treasurer may prescribe forms and procedures for administration of this line of credit.

(e) A school district may repay its loan or any portion of its loan in advance at any time without penalty.

as a fraction of assessed value for the most recent assessment against which the school district’s existing levies are made.
The qualifying percentage of interest granted under this section shall be the higher of the amounts shown in the following tables:

33-1018. Public school discretionary funding variability.

The legislature shall annually state in the appropriation for the educational support program/division of operations the estimate of the total discretionary funding provided per support unit. The department of education shall, before the end of each fiscal year, calculate the actual discretionary funding available per support unit.

If the total estimated discretionary funding per support unit stated in the appropriation for the educational support program/division of operations is lower than the actual discretionary funding available per support unit, then the state controller shall multiply the difference by the number of actual support units, and transfer the result from the public school income fund to the public education stabilization fund and the final distributions to school districts from the department of education shall be reduced by a like amount.

If the total estimated discretionary funding per support unit stated in the appropriation for the educational support program/division of operations is greater than the actual discretionary funding available per support unit, then the state controller shall multiply the difference by the number of actual support units, and transfer the result from the public education stabilization fund to the public school income fund. This transfer shall be limited to moneys available in the public education stabilization fund. Moneys transferred from the public education stabilization fund to the public school income fund under the provisions of this section are hereby continuously appropriated for the educational support program/division of operations.

33-1018A. Other uses of public education stabilization fund.

If, in any fiscal year, general fund revenues are inadequate to sustain general fund appropriations made for that year by the legislature, then the board of examiners may transfer moneys from the public education stabilization fund to the general fund. The maximum amount that may be transferred by the board in any fiscal year shall be determined by dividing the total of all general fund appropriations for the educational support program by the total of all general fund appropriations, and multiplying the result by the amount of the shortfall in general fund revenues.

The governor may recommend, and the legislature may authorize, the appropriation of moneys from the public education stabilization fund to offset declining distributions from the public school earnings reserve fund to the public school income fund.

33-1018B. School building maintenance matching funds.

If the amount of money appropriated from the school district building account created in section 33-905, Idaho Code, is insufficient to meet the state matching fund requirements of section 33-1019, Idaho Code, then such insufficiency shall be made up with a distribution from the public education stabilization fund created in section 33-907, Idaho Code.

33-1018C. Public education stabilization fund — Replacement funds.

In the event that moneys are withdrawn from the public education stabilization fund for the circumstances authorized pursuant to section 33-1018 or 33-1018B, Idaho Code, then the joint finance-appropriations committee shall consider transferring the amount of the withdrawal as a supplemental appropriation to the public education stabilization fund for the current fiscal year.